Alaska, session 34, SB15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 04.09.210(c) is amended to read: 05 (c) The board may issue or renew a license under this section only if the 06 (1) board determines that 07 (A) the licensed premises is a bona fide restaurant as defined in 08 AS 04.21.080(b); 09 (B) there is supervision on the premises adequate to reasonably 10 ensure that a person under 21 years of age will not obtain alcoholic beverages, 11 unless the person is employed as permitted in AS 04.16.049(d); and 12 (C) it is unlikely that persons under 21 years of age not 13 employed on the premises will enter and remain on the licensed premises for 14 purposes other than dining; and 15 (2) sale and service of food and alcoholic beverages and any other 16 business conducted on the licensed premises of the restaurant or eating place is under 01 the sole control of the licensee. 02 * Sec. 2. AS 04.09.210(d) is amended to read: 03 (d) The board may authorize the holder of a restaurant or eating place license 04 (1) to allow a person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years 05 of age to enter and remain on the licensed premises for dining only; 06 (2) to allow a person who is under 16 years of age to enter and remain 07 on the licensed premises for dining only if 08 (A) the person is accompanied by a person who is 21 years of 09 age or older; and 10 (B) the parent or guardian of the person consents to the person 11 being on the licensed premises; and 12 (3) subject to AS 04.16.049, to employ or permit the employment of a 13 person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years of age on the licensed 14 premises if the employer provides adequate supervision to ensure that an employee 15 who is 16 or 17 years of age [THE PERSON] does not obtain alcoholic beverages. 16 * Sec. 3. AS 04.09.220(d) is amended to read: 17 (d) Alcoholic beverages sold under a club license may be purchased only by 18 (1) members of the club and their families; 19 (2) widows or widowers of deceased members of the club who have 20 been accorded club privileges; [AND] 21 (3) military personnel on active duty who are extended the privilege by 22 patriotic organizations; and 23 (4) members of a patriotic organization licensed under this section 24 that has a reciprocity agreement with another patriotic organization licensed 25 under this section. 26 * Sec. 4. AS 04.09.220 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 27 (m) A patriotic organization licensed under this section may enter into a 28 reciprocity agreement with another patriotic organization licensed under this section to 29 allow each organization to sell alcoholic beverages to members of both organizations. 30 The decision to enter into a reciprocity agreement shall be made by a majority of 31 members present at a general meeting of each patriotic organization. 01 * Sec. 5. AS 04.09.250(c) is amended to read: 02 (c) The holder of a theater license may sell or serve alcoholic beverages only 03 in designated areas on the licensed premises and only for a period beginning two 04 hours [ONE HOUR] before the event until one hour after the event [AND DURING 05 INTERMISSIONS]. 06 * Sec. 6. AS 04.09.360(c) is amended to read: 07 (c) The board may issue or renew a license under this section only if 08 (1) the board determines that 09 (A) the licensed premises is a bona fide restaurant as defined in 10 AS 04.21.080(b); 11 (B) there is supervision on the premises adequate to reasonably 12 ensure that a person under 21 years of age will not obtain alcoholic beverages, 13 except as provided under AS 04.16.049(d); and 14 (C) it is unlikely that persons under 21 years of age not 15 employed on the premises will enter and remain on the licensed premises for 16 purposes other than dining; and 17 (2) the sale and service of food and alcoholic beverages and any other 18 business conducted on the licensed premises of the restaurant or eating place is under 19 the sole control of the licensee. 20 * Sec. 7. AS 04.09.360(f) is amended to read: 21 (f) The board may authorize the holder of a seasonal restaurant or eating place 22 tourism license 23 (1) to allow a person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years 24 of age to enter and remain on the licensed premises for dining only; 25 (2) to allow a person who is under 16 years of age to enter and remain 26 on the licensed premises for dining only if 27 (A) the person is accompanied by a person who is 21 years of 28 age or older; and 29 (B) the parent or guardian of the person consents to the person 30 being on the licensed premises; and 31 (3) subject to AS 04.16.049, to employ or permit the employment of a 01 person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years of age on the licensed 02 premises if the employer provides adequate supervision to ensure that an employee 03 who is 16 or 17 years of age [THE PERSON] does not obtain alcoholic beverages. 04 * Sec. 8. AS 04.09.450(d) is amended to read: 05 (d) The board may issue an endorsement under this section only if the board 06 finds 07 (1) that the establishment or portion of the establishment for which the 08 endorsement is requested is a bona fide restaurant; 09 (2) there is supervision on the premises adequate to reasonably ensure 10 that a person under 21 years of age will not obtain alcoholic beverages, except as 11 provided under AS 04.16.049(d); and 12 (3) that it is unlikely that persons under 21 years of age not employed 13 on the premises will enter and remain on the premises of the bona fide restaurant for 14 purposes other than dining. 15 * Sec. 9. AS 04.09.450(e) is amended to read: 16 (e) The board may authorize the holder of a license with a restaurant 17 endorsement 18 (1) to allow a person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years 19 of age to enter and remain on the licensed premises for dining only; 20 (2) to allow a person who is under 16 years of age to enter and remain 21 on the licensed premises for dining only if 22 (A) the person is accompanied by a person who is 21 years of 23 age or older; and 24 (B) the parent or guardian of the person consents to the person 25 being on the licensed premises; and 26 (3) subject to AS 04.16.049, to employ or permit the employment of a 27 person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years of age on the premises of the 28 bona fide restaurant if the employer provides adequate supervision to ensure that an 29 employee who is 16 or 17 years of age [THE PERSON] does not obtain alcoholic 30 beverages. 31 * Sec. 10. AS 04.16.049(d) is amended to read: 01 (d) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section and AS 04.16.050(a), 02 a person 18, 19, or 20 years of age may be employed within the licensed premises of a 03 brewery manufacturer, winery manufacturer, distillery manufacturer, hotel or 04 motel, large resort, golf course, general wholesaler, limited brewed beverage and wine 05 wholesaler, common carrier dispensary, outdoor recreation lodge, brewery retailer, 06 winery retailer, distillery retailer, or restaurant, may enter and remain within those 07 premises for the purpose of employment, and, other than for a business that offers 08 adult entertainment, [BUT] may [NOT], in the course of employment, sell, serve, 09 deliver, or dispense alcoholic beverages. 10 * Sec. 11. AS 04.16.049(h) is amended to read: 11 (h) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person under 21 12 years of age may be present 13 (1) on the licensed premises of a 14 (A) common carrier dispensary, destination resort, or outdoor 15 recreation lodge for the purpose of travel, travel lodging, or outdoor recreation 16 activities provided by the licensee if the person is 17 (i) [(1)] at least 16 years of age; or 18 (ii) [(2)] under 16 years of age and a parent or legal 19 guardian of the underaged person consents; 20 (B) theater if the person is 21 (i) at least 16 years of age; or 22 (ii) under 16 years of age, is accompanied by a 23 person who is at least 21 years of age, and a parent or legal 24 guardian of the underaged person consents; 25 (2) in the areas of a licensed premises covered by a large resort 26 endorsement, but excluding the areas of the premises originally covered by the 27 licensee's beverage dispensary or beverage dispensary tourism license where 28 alcohol is being served, for the purpose of travel, travel lodging, or outdoor 29 recreation activities provided by the large resort if the person is 30 (A) at least 16 years of age; or 31 (B) under 16 years of age and a parent or legal guardian of 01 the underaged person consents. 02 * Sec. 12. AS 04.16.049 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 03 (k) In this section, "business that offers adult entertainment" has the meaning 04 given in AS 23.10.350(f). 05 * Sec. 13. AS 04.16.052(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) A licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee may not with criminal 07 negligence 08 (1) allow another person to sell, barter, or give an alcoholic beverage 09 to a person under the age of 21 years within licensed premises, except as provided in 10 AS 04.16.049(d); 11 (2) allow a person under the age of 21 years to enter and remain within 12 licensed premises except as provided in AS 04.16.049; 13 (3) allow a person under the age of 21 years to consume an alcoholic 14 beverage within licensed premises; 15 (4) allow a person under the age of 21 years to sell or serve alcoholic 16 beverages, except as provided in AS 04.16.049(d); 17 (5) while working on licensed premises, furnish or deliver alcoholic 18 beverages to a person under the age of 21 years, except as provided in 19 AS 04.16.049(d). 20 * Sec. 14. AS 04.21.065(b) is amended to read: 21 (b) The warning signs required by (a) of this section must be at least 11 inches 22 by 14 inches, and the lettering must be at least one-half inch high and in contrasting 23 colors. The first sign must read, "WARNING: Alcohol use [DRINKING 24 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES SUCH AS BEER, WINE, WINE COOLERS, AND 25 DISTILLED SPIRITS OR SMOKING CIGARETTES] during pregnancy can cause 26 birth defects. Alcohol use can cause cancer, including breast and colon cancers." 27 The second sign must read, "WARNING: A person who provides alcoholic beverages 28 to a person under 21 years of age, if convicted under AS 04.16.051, could be 29 imprisoned for up to five years and fined up to $50,000." The third sign must read, 30 "WARNING: An unaccompanied person under 21 years of age who enters these 31 premises in violation of law may, under AS 04.16.049(e), be civilly liable for damages 01 of $1,500." The license or permit holder shall display the first and second signs in a 02 manner that would make them conspicuous to a person who will be purchasing or 03 consuming alcoholic beverages or smoking cigarettes on the licensed or designated 04 premises and shall conspicuously display the third sign at each door through which 05 customers enter the licensed premises. 06 * Sec. 15. AS 04.09.250(d) is repealed. 07 * Sec. 16. Section 14 of this Act takes effect August 1, 2025. 08 * Sec. 17. Except as provided in sec. 16 of this Act, this Act takes effect May 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.